Hawaii statutes.
§425-119 Liability of purported partner.
(a) If a person, by word or conduct, purports to be a partner, or consents to
being represented by another as a partner, in a partnership or with one or more
persons not partners, the purported partner is liable to a person to whom the
representation is made, if that person, relying on the representation, enters
into a transaction with the actual or purported partnership. If the
representation, either by the purported partner or by a person with the
purported partner's consent, is made in a public manner, the purported partner
is liable to a person who relies upon the purported partnership even if the
purported partner is not aware of being held out as a partner to the claimant.
If partnership liability results, the purported partner is liable with respect
to that liability as if the purported partner were a partner. If no
partnership liability results, the purported partner is liable with respect to
that liability jointly and severally with any other person consenting to the
representation.

(b) If a person is thus represented to be a
partner in an existing partnership, or with one or more persons not partners,
the purported partner is an agent of persons consenting to the representation
to bind them to the same extent and in the same manner as if the purported
partner were a partner, with respect to persons who enter into transactions in
reliance upon the representation. If all of the partners of the existing
partnership consent to the representation, a partnership act or obligation
results. If fewer than all of the partners of the existing partnership consent
to the representation, the person acting and the partners consenting to the
representation are jointly and severally liable.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in
subsections (a) and (b), persons who are not partners as to each other are not
liable as partners to other persons. [L 1999, c 284, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next